Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-1316
Educational telecommunications; commission;
powers; duties.

The powers and duties of the Nebraska Educational
Telecommunications Commission are:

(1) To promote and sponsor a noncommercial educational television network to serve a series of interconnecting units throughout
the State of Nebraska;

(2) To promote and support locally operated or state-operated noncommercial
educational radio stations with satellite receiving capabilities and improved
transmitter coverage;

(3) To apply for and to receive and hold such authorizations, licenses,
and assignments of channels from the Federal Communications Commission as
may be necessary to conduct such educational telecommunications programs by
standard radio and television broadcast or by other telecommunications technology
broadcast systems and to prepare, file, and prosecute before the Federal Communications
Commission all applications, reports, or other documents or requests for authorization
of any kind necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes set forth in
the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Act;

(4) To receive gifts and contributions from public and private sources
to be expended in providing educational telecommunications facilities and
programs;

(5) To acquire real estate and other property as an agency of the State
of Nebraska and to hold and use the same for educational telecommunications
purposes;

(6) To contract for the construction, repair, maintenance, and operation
of telecommunications facilities;

(7) To contract with common carriers, qualified under the laws of the
State of Nebraska, to provide interconnecting channels or satellite facilities
in support of radio, television, and other telecommunications technology services
unless it is first determined by the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications
Commission that state-owned interconnecting channels can be constructed and
operated that would furnish a comparable quality of service at a cost to the
state that would be less than if such channels were provided by qualified
common carriers;

(8) To provide for programming for the visually impaired, other print-handicapped
persons, and the deaf and hard of hearing as authorized by the Federal Communications
Commission under subsidiary communications authority rules, through contracts
with appropriate nonprofit corporations or organizations which have been created
for such purpose;

(9) To arrange for the operation of statewide educational telecommunications
networks, as directed by the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission,
consistent with the provisions of the federal Communications Act of 1934,
as amended, and applicable rules and regulations, with policies of the Federal
Communications Commission, in cooperation with the State Board of Education
insofar as elementary and secondary education programs are concerned, and
in cooperation with the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education
insofar as postsecondary education programs are concerned;

(10) After taking into consideration the needs of the entire state,
to establish and maintain general policies relating to the nature and character
of educational telecommunications broadcasts or transmissions;

(11) To review, or cause to be reviewed by a person designated by the
commission, all programs presented on the network prior to broadcast or transmission
to insure that the programs are suitable for viewing and listening. Such suitability
shall be determined by evaluating the content of the program, and screening
the programs if necessary, as to their educational value and whether they
enhance the cultural appreciation of the viewer and listener and do not appeal
to his or her prurient interest. When it is obvious from an examination of
the descriptive program materials that a program is suitable for presenting
on the network, no further review shall be required;

(12) To cooperate with the United States Secretary of Commerce and other
federal or state agencies for the purpose of obtaining matching federal or
state funds and providing educational telecommunications facilities of all
types throughout the state and to make such reports as may be required of
recipients of matching funds;

(13) To arrange for and provide standard radio and television broadcast
and other telecommunications technology transmissions of noncommercial educational
telecommunications programs to Nebraska citizens and institutions, but no
tax funds shall be used for program advertising which may only be financed
out of funds received from foundations or individual gifts;

(14) To coordinate with Nebraska agencies that deal with telecommunications
activities and are supported in whole or in part by public funds, providing
program material for the Nebraska educational telecommunications network;

(15) To adopt bylaws for the conduct of its affairs;

(16) To make certain that the facilities are not used for any purpose
which is contrary to the United States Constitution or the Constitution of
Nebraska or for broadcasting propaganda or attempting to influence legislation;

(17) To publish such informational material as it deems necessary and
it may, at its discretion, charge appropriate fees therefor. The proceeds
of all such fees shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the State Educational Telecommunications
Fund and shall be used by the commission solely for publishing such informational
material. The commission shall provide to newspapers, radio stations, and
other news media program schedules informing the public of programs approved
by the commission; and

(18) To maintain a library of films and videotapes which depict persons
who appear to be significant or prominent in Nebraska history.

Laws 1963, c. 468, § 3, p. 1497;

Laws 1965, c. 535, § 2, p. 1682;

Laws 1969, c. 743, § 1, p. 2799;

Laws 1969, c. 744, § 1, p. 2802;

Laws 1969, c. 742, § 2, p. 2796;

Laws 1974, LB 306, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 645, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 461, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2103;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 972;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 53;

Laws 2000, LB 1328, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB331, § 1.
August 27, 2011